New York, session 2025-2026, A8634.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1112 of the public health law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 12-a to read as follows: 3 12-a. a. The commissioner shall: 4 (i) modify the existing maximum contaminant level for perfluorooctane 5 sulfonic acid (PFOS) and perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA) to be no higher 6 than 4 parts per trillion; and 7 (ii) establish a maximum contaminant level no higher than 10 parts per 8 trillion (ppt) for perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA), perfluorohexane sulfo- 9 nate (PFHxS), and hexafluoropropylene oxide dimer acid (HFPO-DA, also 10 known as GenX). 11 b. The commissioner shall determine and report to the governor and the 12 legislature by May first, two thousand twenty-eight, what additional 13 requirements, if any, are warranted to address cumulative exposure to 14 multiple per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, including but not limited 15 to, the substances listed in paragraph a of this subdivision. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06979-06-6 A. 8634--B 2 1 c. The commissioner shall require that public water systems comply 2 with the requirements of the maximum contaminant levels required by this 3 subdivision by May first, two thousand twenty-nine. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 5 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 6 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 7 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 8 effective date.